District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

34-1304

Submission of Appropriateness standards to the Council.

Repealed.

History

May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-120, § 5, 41 DCR 1648
May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-107, § 207, 47 DCR 1091

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-2004.